Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,112
State and local taxes; current payment; certification; exception.

Before an official designation as an iHub, the applicant shall self-certify that the iHub and its iHub partners are current in the payment of all state and local taxes owed, except that this section does not apply as to the payment of state and local taxes by an applicant that is exempt from such payment pursuant to section 13-3309.

Laws 2022, LB450, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB1344, § 19.
July 19, 2024